Utah statutes.
76-9-702.7.   Voyeurism offenses -- Penalties.

(1)  A person is guilty of voyeurism who intentionally uses a camcorder, motion picture camera, photographic camera of any type, or other equipment that is concealed or disguised to secretly or surreptitiously videotape, film, photograph, record, or view by electronic means an individual:

(a)  for the purpose of viewing any portion of the individual's body regarding which the individual has a reasonable expectation of privacy, whether or not that portion of the body is covered with clothing;

(b)  without the knowledge or consent of the individual; and

(c)  under circumstances in which the individual has a reasonable expectation of privacy.

(2)  A violation of Subsection (1) is a class A misdemeanor, except that a violation of Subsection (1) committed against a child under 14 years of age is a third degree felony.

(3)  Distribution or sale of any images, including in print, electronic, magnetic, or digital format, obtained under Subsection (1) by transmission, display, or dissemination is a third degree felony, except that if the violation of this Subsection (3) includes images of a child under 14 years of age, the violation is a second degree felony.

(4)  A person is guilty of voyeurism who, under circumstances not amounting to a violation of Subsection (1), views or attempts to view an individual, with or without the use of any instrumentality:

(a)  with the intent of viewing any portion of the individual's body regarding which the individual has a reasonable expectation of privacy, whether or not that portion of the body is covered with clothing;

(b)  without the knowledge or consent of the individual; and

(c)  under circumstances in which the individual has a reasonable expectation of privacy.

(5)  A violation of Subsection (4) is a class B misdemeanor, except that a violation of Subsection (4) committed against a child under 14 years of age is a class A misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 52, 2004 General Session

